Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.133

Rules of director—Personnel administration.

(1) The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(a) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(b) Training and career development;

(c) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except as follows:

(i) Entry-level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months; and

(ii) The probationary period of campus police officer appointees who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training commission basic law enforcement academy shall extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not required. The director shall adopt rules to ensure that employees promoting to campus police officer who are required to attend the Washington state criminal justice training commission basic law enforcement academy shall have the trial service period extend from the date of appointment until twelve months from the date of successful completion of the basic law enforcement academy, or twelve months from the date of appointment if academy training is not required;

(d) Transfers;

(e) Promotional preferences;

(f) Sick leaves and vacations;

(g) Hours of work;

(h) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for the financial basis for layoffs;

(i) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;

(j) Subject to RCW 41.04.820, adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental units;

(k) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(l) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;

(m) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and who, upon termination of such service, has received a qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005. However, the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.

(2) Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide for local administration and management by the institutions of higher education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by the director.

(3) Rules adopted by the director under this section may be superseded by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the respective collective bargaining units.

[ 2024 c 146 s 15; 2023 c 148 s 1. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 407; 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 5; prior: 2010 c 2 s 3; 2010 c 1 s 2; prior: 2009 c 534 s 2; 2009 c 5 s 2; 2002 c 354 s 204.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Findings—Effective date—2010 c 2: See notes following RCW 41.06.070.

Effective date—2010 c 1: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Finding—Intent—2009 c 534: "The legislature finds that information technologies have substantially altered the roles and responsibilities of employees in many state agencies since the creation of the Washington management service. With the understanding that the current economic crisis dictates finding every possible efficiency, the legislature intends to review the state's senior management and exempt services and understands that possible refinements in the service are needed. A review, in consultation with the various stakeholders and in light of current best practices, is warranted." [ 2009 c 534 s 1.]

Effective date—2009 c 5: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.